Utah statutes.
17C-3-302.   Continuing a hearing.

Subject to Section 17C-3-303, the board may continue from time to time a:

(1)  plan hearing;

(2)  budget hearing; or

(3)  combined plan hearing and budget hearing under Section 17C-3-301.

